Utah statutes.
53B-17-502.   Definitions.

As used in Sections 53B-17-501 through 53B-17-506:

(1)  "Patent" means the patent covering the land acquired by the University of Utah from the United States of America dated October 18, 1968.

(2)  "Research park" means research and development facilities, research institutes, testing laboratories, related business and government installations, and similar facilities, together with land, including all necessary appurtenances, rights, and franchises acquired and developed by the University of Utah which are suitable or necessary to promote the social welfare of the state of Utah through the advancement of education, science, research, economic development, and related purposes.  The acquisition and provision of any one or more of the following facilities may be included as part of the development of land for the research park: water, sewage, drainage, street, road, sidewalk, curb, gutter, street lighting, electrical distribution, and docking, but only to the extent that the facilities are incidental to the use of the land as a research park.



Enacted by Chapter 167, 1987 General Session

